District of Columbia statutes.
32-1104

Occupational safety and health plan.

Within 1 year from March 16, 1989, and pursuant to § 18 of the Federal Act [29 U.S.C. § 667 ], the Mayor shall adopt and submit to the Secretary an occupational safety and health plan. The plan shall be consistent with the provisions of this chapter and shall be at least as effective in ensuring safety and healthful workplaces and conditions of employment as the agreements, contracts, standards, rules, and regulations made or promulgated pursuant to the Federal Act.

History

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-186, § 5, 35 DCR 8250

Section References

This section is referenced in § 32-1101.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 36-1204.

References in Text

“Section 18 of the Federal Act,” referred to in the first sentence, is 29 U.S.C. § 667.